Utah, session 2026, HB491.
Section 1. Section 52-4-103 is amended to read:52-4-103. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Anchor location" means:(a)the physical location where the public body conducting an electronic meeting under Section 52-4-207 normally conducts meetings of the public body; or(b)a location other than the location described in Subsection (1)(a) that is reasonably as accessible to the public as the location described in Subsection (1)(a).(2)"Capitol hill complex" means the grounds and buildings within the area bounded by 300 North Street, Columbus Street, 500 North Street, and East Capitol Boulevard in Salt Lake City.(3)"Electronic meeting" means a meeting that some or all public body members attend through an electronic video, audio, or both video and audio connection, as provided in Section 52-4-207.(4)"Fiduciary or commercial information" means information:(a)related to any subject if disclosure:(i)would conflict with a fiduciary obligation; or(ii)is prohibited by insider trading provisions; or(b)that is commercial in nature including:(i)account owners or borrowers;(ii)demographic data;(iii)contracts and related payments;(iv)negotiations;(v)proposals or bids;(vi)investments;(vii)management of funds;(viii)fees and charges;(ix)plan and program design;(x)investment options and underlying investments offered to account owners;(xi)marketing and outreach efforts;(xii)financial plans; or(xiii)reviews and audits.(5)"Meeting" means a gathering:(a)of a public body or specified body;(b)with a quorum present; and(c)that is convened:(i)by an individual:(A)with authority to convene the public body or specified body; and(B)following the process provided by law for convening the public body or specified body; and(ii)for the express purpose of acting as a public body or specified body to:(A)receive public comment about a relevant matter;(B)deliberate about a relevant matter; or(C)take action upon a relevant matter.(6)"Participate" means the ability to communicate with all of the members of a public body, either verbally or electronically, so that each member of the public body can hear or observe the communication.(7)(a)"Public body" means:(i)any administrative, advisory, executive, or legislative body of the state or its political subdivisions that:(A)is created by the Utah Constitution, statute, rule, ordinance, or resolution;(B)consists of two or more individuals;(C)expends, disburses, or is supported in whole or in part by tax revenue; and(D)is vested with the authority to make decisions regarding the public's business; or(ii)any administrative, advisory, executive, or policymaking body of an association, as that term is defined in Section 53G-7-1101, that:(A)consists of two or more individuals;(B)expends, disburses, or is supported in whole or in part by dues paid by a public school or whose employees participate in a benefit or program described in Title 49, Utah State Retirement and Insurance Benefit Act; and(C)is vested with authority to make decisions regarding the participation of a public school or student in an interscholastic activity, as that term is defined in Section 53G-7-1101.(b)"Public body" includes:(i)an interlocal entity or joint or cooperative undertaking, as those terms are defined in Section 11-13-103, except for the Water District Water Development Council created pursuant toin accordance with Section 11-13-228;(ii)a governmental nonprofit corporation as that term is defined in Section 11-13a-102;(iii)the Utah Independent Redistricting Commission; and(iv)a project entity, as that term is defined in Section 11-13-103.(c)"Public body" does not include:(i)a political party, a political group, or a political caucus;(ii)a conference committee, a rules committee, a sifting committee, or an administrative staff committee of the Legislature;(iii)a school community council or charter trust land council, as that term is defined in Section 53G-7-1203;(iv)a taxed interlocal entity, as that term is defined in Section 11-13-602, if the taxed interlocal entity is not a project entity;(v)the following Legislative Management subcommittees, which are established in Section 36-12-8, when meeting for the purpose of selecting or evaluating a candidate to recommend for employment, except that the meeting in which a subcommittee votes to recommend that a candidate be employed shall be subject to the provisions of this actchapter:(A)the Research and General Counsel Subcommittee;(B)the Budget Subcommittee; and(C)the Audit Subcommittee; or(vi)the highway designation review committee created in Section 72-4-402; or(vi)(vii)a search committee that selects finalists for a position as an institution of higher education president under Section 53H-3-302.(8)"Public statement" means a statement made in the ordinary course of business of the public body with the intent that all other members of the public body receive it.(9)"Quorum" means a simple majority of the membership of a public body, unless otherwise defined by applicable law.(10)"Recording" means an audio, or an audio and video, record of the proceedings of a meeting that can be used to review the proceedings of the meeting.(11)(a)"Relevant matter" means a matter that is within the scope of the authority of a public body or specified body.(b)"Relevant matter" does not include, for a public body with both executive and legislative responsibilities, a managerial or operational matter.(12)"Specified body":(a)means an administrative, advisory, executive, or legislative body that:(i)is not a public body;(ii)consists of three or more members; and(iii)includes at least one member who is:(A)a legislator; and(B)officially appointed to the body by the president of the Senate, speaker of the House of Representatives, or governor; and(b)does not include a body listed in Subsection (7)(c)(ii), or (7)(c)(v), or (7)(c)(vi).

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 72-4-401 is enacted to read:4. State Highway Special Designation Process72-4-401. Process for special designation of highways.(1)A proposal for a special designation of a state highway by the Legislature under this chapter shall follow the procedures described in this part.(2)A proposal for a special designation of a highway shall comply with the following:(a)applies only to a state highway;(b)includes only one special designation for a specific portion of the highway;(c)provides for at least a five-mile gap between each portion of a highway with a special designation;(d)does not propose more than one special designation of a highway for the same individual; and(e)honors:(i)an individual who:(A)exemplifies exceptional bravery in the line of duty, including as a fallen officer, fire fighter, emergency responder, or member of the armed forces, or provided extraordinary contributions to the state or a particular region of the state that are of lasting and significant public importance;(B)has significant ties to the state; and(C)has been deceased for at least five years before the proposal of the special designation; or(ii)a group with significant ties to the state.(3)(a)Signage for the special highway designation shall comply with department standards and specifications.(b)Signage is limited to two signs total, with one sign installed for each direction of travel on the highway.(c)The costs of fabrication, installation, and maintenance of the special designation signage shall be paid for by:(i)state General Fund appropriations; or(ii)private donations or gifts, if the donation or gift is managed in accordance with applicable law and department policy.(4)A legislator may propose a special designation of a highway to the highway designation review committee created in Section 72-4-402.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 72-4-402 is enacted to read:72-4-402. Committee review of proposals of special designations of highways -- Interim committee approval.(1)There is created the highway designation review committee.(2)The committee is comprised of six legislators appointed as follows:(a)three senators appointed by the president of the Senate; and(b)three representatives appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives.(3)The committee shall include at least two members of the minority party.(4)The president of the Senate shall designate one of the Senate appointees as one co-chair of the committee and the speaker of the House of Representatives shall designate one of the House of Representatives appointees as the other co-chair.(5)The committee is not a public body and is exempt from Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.(6)The committee shall receive and hear proposals for special designations of state highways.(7)The committee may approve only one proposal for the special designation of a state highway each year.(8)If the committee approves a proposal for a special designation of a state highway, the legislator who proposed the special designation may seek a recommendation from the Transportation Interim Committee.(9)The Transportation Interim Committee may approve only one proposal for the special designation of a state highway each year.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.